Maryland, session 2025, HB0613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–301.
(a) On motion of the State or on request of a victim or witness, during a criminal
trial or a juvenile delinquency adjudicatory hearing, a court may prohibit the release of the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0613*

HOUSE BILL 613
address or telephone number of the victim or witness unless the court determines that good
cause is shown for the release of the information.
(b) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Identifying information” means the name of, and any other
information that could reasonably be expected to identify, a [minor] victim.
(iii) “Minor victim” means [a] AN ALLEGED victim of a crime or
delinquent act who was a minor at the time that the crime or delinquent act occurred.
(IV) “VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT” MEANS AN ALLEGED VICTIM
OF A CRIME UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 OR SUBTITLE 11 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, [on notice that an electronic or paper
filing includes identifying information of] IN A CASE OR FILING INVOLVING a minor
victim OR A VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT, unless the court finds by clear and convincing
evidence that there is good cause to order otherwise, the court or a party in a criminal or
juvenile delinquency case may not disclose or allow inspection of an electronic or paper
court filing, including a charging document, to a nonparty to the criminal or juvenile
delinquency case unless the court or the party disclosing or allowing inspection of the filing
redacts all identifying information that appears in the filing.
(3) (I) ON WRITTEN REQUEST OF A VICTIM OF SEXUAL ASSAULT,
THE COURT SHALL REDACT IDENTIFYING INFORMATION RELATING TO THE VICTIM
OF SEXUAL ASSAULT FROM AN EXISTING FILING.
(II) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL, BY RULE,
ADOPT PROCEDURES TO IMPLEMENT SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.